Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1314.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 54 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 9COMPASSIONATE NAME CHANGE ASSISTANCEGRANT PROGRAMSec.901. Definitions.902. Grant program.903. Compassionate Name Change Assistance Grant Fund.904. Administration.§ 901. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 123456789101112131415161718 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible applicant." A nonprofit organization, county or local government."Eligible assistance program." A program providing support and guidance that is informational, emotional, social, legal or otherwise to individuals who confront biases or inequalities based on gender or sexual stereotypes in navigating the process of a name change in this Commonwealth."Fund." The Compassionate Name Change Assistance Grant Fund established under section 903 (relating to Compassionate Name Change Assistance Grant Fund)."Grant program." The Compassionate Name Change Assistance Grant Program established under section 902 (relating to grant program)."Nonprofit organization." A corporation or other entity based in this Commonwealth which is an exempt organization as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.).§ 902. Grant program.(a) Establishment.--The Compassionate Name Change Assistance Grant Program is established as a competitive grant program within the department.(b) Uses for funds.--A grant award under the grant program may only be used for the costs of administering an eligible assistance program.(c) Department powers and duties.--The department shall:(1) Provide grants under the grant program in accordance 20250HB1314PN1507 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with this chapter to eligible applicants to administer eligible assistance programs.(2) Determine the form and manner by which an eligible applicant may apply for a grant under section 904 (relating to administration). The application form shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Establish guidelines for implementing the grant program under this section. The guidelines shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 903. Compassionate Name Change Assistance Grant Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Compassionate Name Change Assistance Grant Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury.(b) Appropriation.--All money deposited into the fund and interest earned on the money in the fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to award grants under this chapter.(c) Transfer from General Fund.--In addition to money appropriated to the department for grants under this chapter, the sum of $2,000,000 is transferred from the General Fund to the Compassionate Name Change Assistance Grant Fund.(d) Administrative costs.--No more than 1% of the fund may be used for reasonable administrative costs of the department in administering this chapter.§ 904. Administration.(a) Applications.--An application for a grant under this chapter shall be submitted by an eligible applicant in the form and manner prescribed by the department.(b) Application period.--Beginning no later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department 20250HB1314PN1507 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall begin accepting and processing applications on a rolling basis until the grant program funding available for the fiscal year has been exhausted.(c) Review process.--(1) The department shall review applications and make awards subject to subsection (d) on a rolling basis.(2) The department shall approve or deny an application no later than 30 days after the receipt of the application. If the department fails to approve or deny the application within 30 days, the application shall be deemed denied.(3) An eligible applicant may revise and resubmit a denied application to the department.(d) Allocation.--An eligible applicant shall be subject to the following amounts in a fiscal year:(1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3):(i) The minimum grant amount awarded shall be no less than $5,000.(ii) The maximum grant amount awarded may not be more than $100,000.(2) The department may award a grant of no more than $75,000 to eligible applicants that are headquartered within a city of the first or second class.(3) The department may award a grant of between $75,000 and $100,000 to eligible applicants that are:(i) headquartered outside of a city of the first or second class; or(ii) implementing a new eligible assistance program for the first time in the same fiscal year that the grant is awarded.(e) Limitations.--The following apply to grant applications:20250HB1314PN1507 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The department may not provide grants in excess of the amount of the fund.(2) The department may prorate the grant amount to an eligible applicant.(3) The department may only award a grant to an eligible applicant that establishes to the department that the administration of the eligible assistance program involves at least one resident of this Commonwealth who identifies as transgender or nonbinary with specialized experience in assisting individuals who confront biases or inequalities based on gender or sexual stereotypes in navigating the name change process in this Commonwealth.(f) Evaluation.--The department shall evaluate the utilization of the grant program money, including an analysis of the total amount of grants awarded, each eligible applicant that received a grant and the efficacy of the eligible assistance programs funded through the grant program based on disaggregated data. The department shall conduct the evaluation, at a minimum, every three years after the establishment of the grant program, and shall post the evaluation on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1314PN1507 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122